South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5177.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-103-15(B) and (C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) The General Assembly has determined that the primary mission or focus for each type of institution of higher learning or other post-secondary school in this State is as follows: (1) Research institutions (a) college-level baccalaureate education, master's, professional, and doctor of philosophy degrees which lead to continued education or employment; (b) research through the use of government, corporate, nonprofit-organization grants, or state resources, or both; and (c) public service to the State and the local community; (2) Doctoral/professional universities (a) college-level baccalaureate education, master's, professional, and no more than a combined five professional doctorate or doctor of philosophy degrees, that lead to continued education or employment; (b) limited and specialized research; and (c) public service to the State and the local community; (3) Four-year colleges and universities (a) college-level baccalaureate education and selected master's degrees which lead to employment or continued education, or both, except for doctoral degrees currently being offered; (b) bachelor of science degree in Mechanical Engineering approved by the Commission on Higher Education at South Carolina State University; (c) bachelor of science degree in Electrical Engineering approved by the Commission on Higher Education at South Carolina State University; (d) doctoral degree in Marine Science approved by the Commission on Higher Education; (e) subject to subsection (C), doctoral degree in Nursing Practice approved by the Commission on Higher Education at Francis Marion University; (f) subject to subsection (C), doctoral degree in Nursing Practice approved by the Commission on Higher Education at the University of South Carolina Aiken; (g) subject to subsection (C), doctor of philosophy degree in Education Administration approved by the Commission on Higher Education at Coastal Carolina University; (h) subject to subsection (C), doctor of philosophy degree in Computer and Information Science approved by the Commission on Higher Education at the College of Charleston; (i) limited and specialized research;  and (j) public service to the State and the local community; (4) Two-year institutions-branches of the University of South Carolina (a) college-level pre-baccalaureate education necessary to confer associates degrees which lead to continued education at a four-year or research institution;  and (b) public service to the State and the local community; (5) State technical and comprehensive education system (a) all post-secondary vocational, technical, and occupational diploma and associate degree programs leading directly to employment or maintenance of employment and associate degree programs which enable students to gain access to other post-secondary education; (b) up-to-date and appropriate occupational and technical training for adults; (c) special school programs that provide training for prospective employees for prospective and existing industry in order to enhance the economic development of South Carolina; (d) public service to the State and the local community; (e) continue to remain technical, vocational, or occupational colleges with a mission as stated in item (4) and primarily focused on technical education and the economic development of the State;  and (f) subject to subsection (C), an Applied Baccalaureate in Advanced Manufacturing Technology degree approved first by the Board for Technical and Comprehensive Education and then the Commission on Higher Education.; and (g) subject to subsection (C), an Applied Baccalaureate in Culinary Arts Management degree at Trident Technical College approved first by the Board for Technical and Comprehensive Education and then the Commission on Higher Education. (C) Notwithstanding subsection (B), the degrees set forth in subsection (B)(3)(e), (f), (g), and (h), and subsection (B)(5)(f) and (g) are only allowed so long as new state general funds are not appropriated for the operations of the degree program. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----